Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Management of the Common Interest Community.

Collateral references. —

Standing to bring action relating to real property of condominium. 74 ALR4th 165.

Sec. 34.08.310.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

An association of unit owners must be organized no later than the date on which the first unit in the common interest community is conveyed.
The membership of the association at all times consists exclusively of all unit owners or, following termination of the common interest community, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under AS

34.08.260

or their heirs, successors, or assigns.
The association must be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation, trust, or partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.320.
Powers of unit owners’ association.

Except as provided in (b) of this section and subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association may

adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;

adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;

hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings or seek injunctive relief for violations of its declaration, bylaws, or rules in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners on matters affecting the common interest community;

make contracts and incur liabilities;

regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements;

cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real estate or personal property, except that

common elements in a condominium or planned community may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only under AS

34.08.430

; and

part of a cooperative may be conveyed or all or part of a cooperative may be subjected to a security interest only under AS

34.08.430

;

grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

impose and receive a payment, fee, or charge for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common elements described in AS

34.08.100

(2) and (4), and for services provided to unit owners;

impose a reasonable charge for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy a reasonable fine for a violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association;

impose a reasonable charge for the preparation and recording of an amendment to the declaration, the filing and recording of a plat or plan that accompanies an amendment, resale certificate required by AS

34.08.590

, or a statement of unpaid assessments;

provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, but only to the extent the declaration expressly permits the assignment;

exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

exercise any other power that may be exercised in the state by a legal entity of the same type as the association; and

exercise any other power necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration may not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 23 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.330.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, (b) of this section, or other provisions of this chapter, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the executive board are required to exercise the care required of fiduciaries of the unit owners.

The executive board may not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration, to terminate the common interest community, or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office of executive board members, but the executive board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of a term.

Within 30 days after adoption of a proposed budget for the common interest community, the executive board shall provide a summary of the budget to each unit owner, and shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget not less than 14 nor more than 30 days after mailing of the summary. Unless at that meeting a majority of all unit owners or any larger vote specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. If the proposed budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified by the unit owners continues until the unit owners ratify a budget proposed by the executive board.

Subject to (e) of this section, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which a declarant or persons designated by the declarant may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of: (1) 60 days after conveyance of 75 percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant; (2) two years after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary course of business; or (3) two years after any right to add new units was last exercised. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before termination of the periods established in this subsection, but in that event the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

Not later than 60 days after conveyance of 25 percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one member and not less than 25 percent of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than 60 days after conveyance of 50 percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than 331/3 percent of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

34.08.280(e)

, not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board. The executive board consists of at least three members, except that if there are fewer than 12 units in the common interest community, the declaration may provide for an executive board with one or two members. At least a majority of the members of the executive board must be unit owners. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers take office upon election.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, following notice under AS

34.08.390

, the unit owners, by a two-thirds vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at a meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove a member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.340.
Transfer of association control.

Before or not more than 60 days after the termination of declarant control, the declarant shall relinquish control of the common interest community and the unit owners shall accept control. At the same time, the declarant shall deliver to the common interest community all property of the unit owners and of the common interest community held or controlled by the declarant including, but not limited to

the original or a photocopy of the recorded declaration and each amendment to the declaration; if a photocopy is provided, it shall be certified by affidavit of the declarant, or an officer or agent of the declarant, as being a complete copy of the actual recorded declaration;

a certified copy of the common interest community articles of incorporation, trust or partnership agreement;

a copy of the bylaws;

the minute books, including all minutes, and other books and records of the common interest community;

the rules and regulations that have been adopted;

resignations of officers and members of the executive board who are required to resign because the declarant is required to relinquish control of the common interest community;

the financial records, including financial statements of the common interest community, and source documents since the incorporation of the common interest community through the date of turnover;

common interest community funds or control of the funds of the common interest community;

all tangible personal property that is property of the common interest community, represented by the declarant to be the property of the association or ostensibly the property of the association and an inventory of the property;

a copy of the plans and specifications utilized in the construction or remodeling of improvements and the supplying of equipment to the common interest community and in the construction and installation of all mechanical components serving the improvements and the site, with a certificate in affidavit form of the declarant or an architect or engineer authorized to practice in the state that the plans and specifications represent, to the best of their knowledge and belief, the actual plans and specifications utilized in the construction and improvement of the common interest community property and for the construction and installation of the mechanical components serving the improvements;

insurance policies;

copies of any certificates of occupancy that may have been issued for the common interest community property;

any other permits issued by governmental bodies applicable to the common interest community property in force or issued within one year before the date the unit owners other than the declarant take control of the common interest community;

all written warranties of the contractor, subcontractors, suppliers, and manufacturers, if any, that are still effective;

a roster of unit owners and their addresses and telephone numbers, if known, as shown on the declarant’s records;

leases of the common elements and other leases to which the association is a party;

employment contracts or service contracts in which the common interest community is one of the contracting parties or service contracts in which the common interest community or the unit owners have an obligation or responsibility, directly or indirectly, to pay some or all of the fee or charge of the person performing the service;

all other contracts to which the common interest community is a party.

The records shall be reviewed by an independent certified public accountant. The minimum report required is a review in accordance with generally accepted accounting standards as defined by regulation by the Board of Public Accountancy. The accountant performing the review shall examine to the extent necessary supporting documents and records, including the cash disbursements and related paid invoices to determine if expenditures were for the common interest community purposes and the billings, cash receipts, and related records to determine that the declarant was charged and paid the proper amounts of assessments.

Before the transfer of control from the declarant to the association, an inspection of the common areas and limited common areas subject to the association’s control shall be completed by

an independent registered engineer, architect, or land surveyor;

an appraiser with the designation of senior residential appraiser, senior real property appraiser, or senior real estate analyst of the Society of Real Estate Appraisers;

a residential member, or member of the appraisal institute, of the American Institute of Real Estate Appraisers; or

an individual with a designation established by regulation of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for fee appraisers who certify the completion of construction.

A report shall be prepared indicating the incomplete work and repairs needed and the method of completing the work and making the repairs. The transfer of control to the association shall be based upon the declarant’s obligation to complete all repairs and finish all incomplete work within a reasonable time after transfer of control under representations in the public offering statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in (c)(3) of this section after the first occurrence of “member”, a comma was inserted and after the second occurrence of “member” a comma was deleted and “of the” was added to correct a manifest error in ch. 95, SLA 1985.

Sec. 34.08.350.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

A special declarant right created or reserved under this chapter may be transferred only by an instrument evidencing the transfer that has been recorded in each recording district in which any portion of the common interest community is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

a transferor is not relieved of an obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed by this chapter; lack of privity does not deprive a unit owner of standing to maintain an action to enforce an obligation of the transferor;

if a successor to a special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for an obligation or liability of the successor relating to the common interest community;

if a transferor retains a special declarant right but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for an obligation or liability imposed on a declarant by this chapter or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant right and arising after the transfer;

a transferor is not liable for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, on the foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Act or receivership proceedings of a unit owned by a declarant or of real estate in a common interest community subject to development rights, the person acquiring title to the property being foreclosed or sold, but only upon the request of the person, succeeds either (1) to the special declarant rights related to the property held by the declarant, or (2) only to any rights reserved in the declaration under AS

34.08.230

and held by that declarant to maintain models, sales offices, and signs. The judgment or instrument conveying title must provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.

Upon foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Act or receivership proceedings, of the interests in a common interest community owned by a declarant

the declarant ceases to have special declarant rights, and

the period of declarant control terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of the special declarant rights held by the declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

a successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to the obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this chapter or by the declaration;

a successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in (3) or (4) of this subsection or a successor who is an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to the obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the declaration

on a declarant that relate to the successor’s exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

on the transferor, other than

misrepresentations by a previous declarant;

warranty obligations on improvements made by a previous declarant or made before the common interest community was created;

breach of a fiduciary obligation by a previous declarant or the appointees of a previous declarant to the executive board; or

a liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the acts or omissions of the transferor after the transfer;

a successor to a right reserved in the declaration only to maintain models, sales offices, and signs may not exercise any other special declarant right and is not subject to liability or obligation as a declarant except the obligation to provide a public offering statement and liability arising as a result of the statement;

a successor to the special declarant rights held by a transferor who succeeded to the rights under a deed or other instrument of conveyance in lieu of foreclosure or under a judgment or instrument conveying title under (c) of this section may declare in a recorded instrument, including one conveying title under (c) of this section

an intention to hold the rights solely for transfer to another person; or

an intention to hold the rights for transfer to another person after making, finishing, or completing improvements in conformity with the declaration, consistent with the public offering statement, plans, and overall development scheme of the common interest community for purposes of preserving or improving the common interest community.

Until transferring the special declarant rights to a person acquiring title to a unit or real estate subject to the development rights owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, the successor may not exercise any of the rights other than those specified in (e)(4)(B) of this section and the right held by the transferor of the successor to control the executive board under AS

34.08.330(d)

for the duration of any period of declarant control and an attempted exercise of rights is void.

So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under (e) of this section, and for purposes of (e)(4)(B) of this section so long as the successor declarant transfers within the time period specified in (h) of this section the rights to a subsequent successor declarant who will assume liability for the improvements made by the successor declarant, the successor declarant is not subject to liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for acts and omissions under AS

34.08.330(d)

.

If a lender fails to transfer special declarant rights to a successor declarant within one year of the date of recording an instrument under (e)(4)(B) of this section, then the lender becomes subject to the obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the declaration as specified in (e)(2) of this section.

Nothing in this section subjects a successor to a special declarant right to a claim against or other obligation of a transferor declarant, other than a claim or obligation arising under this chapter or the declaration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.360.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into before the executive board elected by the unit owners under AS

34.08.330(f)

takes office (1) a management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities; (2) a contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant; or (3) a contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the unit owners at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the executive board elected by the unit owners under AS

34.08.330(f)

takes office upon not less than 90 days’ notice to the other party.

This section does not apply to

a lease if a termination of the lease would terminate the common interest community or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to the lease was included in the common interest community for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section; or

a proprietary lease.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.370.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association must provide

for the number of the members of the executive board and for the titles of the officers of the association;

for the election by the executive board of a president, treasurer, secretary, and other officers of the association specified by the bylaws;

for the qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

for a method of amending the bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association considers necessary and appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutes, or of condominium association’s bylaws or regulations, restricting number of units that may be owned by single individual or entity. 39 ALR4th 88.

Sec. 34.08.380.
Upkeep of common interest community.

Except to the extent provided by the declaration, by (b) of this section, or by AS

34.08.440(h)

, the association is responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner is responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association, the other unit owners, and to their agents or employees, access through the unit that is reasonably necessary for maintenance and repair of the unit. If damage is inflicted on the common elements or on any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner responsible for the damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the prompt repair of the damage.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under this chapter, a declarant is solely liable for the expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights. No other unit owner and no other portion of the common interest community is subject to a claim for payment of expenses in connection with development rights. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the income and proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

In a planned community, when all development rights have expired with respect to real estate, the declarant remains liable for the expenses of the real estate unless, upon expiration, the declaration provides that the real estate becomes common elements or units.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.390.
Meetings.

A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year.
A special meeting of the association may be called by the president, by a majority of the members of the executive board, or by unit owners comprising either 20 percent or a lower percentage specified in the bylaws of the votes in the association.
Not less than 10 nor more than 60 days in advance of a meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to the mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner.
The notice of a meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of a proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, budget changes, and a proposal to remove an officer or member of the executive board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.400.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout a meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast 20 percent of the votes that may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is considered present throughout a meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast 50 percent of the votes on the board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.410.
Voting and proxies.

If only one of several owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, the owner present is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to the unit. If more than one of the owners are present, the votes allocated to the unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the owners casts the votes allocated to the unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by another owner of the unit.

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast under a proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may revoke a proxy given under this section only by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. A proxy terminates one year after its date, unless it specifies a shorter term.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units (1) the provisions of (a) and (b) of this section apply to lessees as if they were unit owners; (2) unit owners who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on the specified matters; and (3) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting the matters as if they were unit owners. Unit owners must also be given notice under AS

34.08.390

, of all meetings at which lessees are entitled to vote.

Votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may not be cast.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.420.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant is liable for the torts of the declarant in connection with any part of the common interest community that the declarant has the responsibility to maintain.
An action alleging a wrong done by the association must be brought against the association and not against a unit owner.
If the wrong occurred during a period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to a unit owner for (1) tort losses not covered by insurance suffered by the association or the unit owner, and (2) each cost that the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract or other wrongful act or omission. If the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant is liable for the expenses of litigation incurred by the association.
A statute of limitation affecting the right of action of the association under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates.
A unit owner is not precluded from maintaining an action under this section because the person is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association.
A lien resulting from a judgment against the association is governed by AS

34.08.480

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

Personal liability of owner of condominium unit to one sustaining personal injury or property damage by conditions of common areas. 39 ALR4th 98.

Association’s liability to unit owner for injuries caused by third person’s criminal conduct. 59 ALR4th 489.

Sec. 34.08.430.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

In a condominium or planned community, portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including 80 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to the action, but each owner of a unit to which a limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey the limited common element or subject it to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if each of the units is restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. The proceeds of the sale and proceeds of a loan secured by encumbering a common area are an asset of the association.

Part of a cooperative may be conveyed and all or part of a cooperative may be subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including 80 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to the action, but, if fewer than all of the units or limited common elements are to be conveyed or subjected to a security interest, then each unit owner of the units to which the limited common elements are allocated must agree in order to convey the units or limited common elements or subject them to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if each of the units is restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. The proceeds of the sale and proceeds of a loan secured by encumbering a common area are an asset of the association. A purported conveyance or other voluntary transfer of an entire cooperative, unless made under AS

34.08.260

, is void.

An agreement to convey common elements in a condominium or planned community or to subject the common elements to a security interest and an agreement to convey any part of a cooperative or subject the cooperative to a security interest must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications of the agreement, in the same manner as a deed by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before the date. The agreement and each ratification of the agreement must be recorded in each recording district in which a portion of the common interest community is situated and is effective only upon recording.

The association on behalf of the unit owners may contract to convey an interest in common interest community under (a) of this section, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved under (a) — (c) of this section. After approval under (a) — (c) of this section, the association has the powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute a deed or other instrument.

Unless made under this section, a purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary transfer of common elements or of any other part of a cooperative is void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements or of a cooperative under this section does not deprive a unit of its rights of access and support.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, a conveyance or encumbrance of common elements under this section does not affect the priority or validity of preexisting encumbrances.

In a cooperative, the association may acquire, hold, encumber, or convey a proprietary lease without complying with this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.440.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available,

property insurance on the common elements and, in a planned community, on property that must become common elements, insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against or, in the case of conversion property, against fire and extended coverage perils, and the total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles must be not less than 100 percent of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the executive board but not less than an amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements and, in cooperatives, of each unit.

In the case of a building that is part of a cooperative or that contains a unit having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, the insurance maintained under (a)(1) of this section, to the extent reasonably available, must include the unit, but need not include improvements and betterments installed by a unit owner.

If the insurance described in (a) and (b) of this section is not reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of the fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to each unit owner. The declaration may require the association to carry other insurance, and the association in any event may carry other insurance it considers appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried under (a) and (b) of this section must provide that

each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of interest of the unit owner in the common elements or membership in the association;

the insurer waives the right to subrogation under the policy against a unit owner or member of the household of a unit owner;

an act or omission by a unit owner, unless acting within the scope of the unit owner’s authority on behalf of the association, will not void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

if, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the policy of the association provides primary insurance.

A loss covered by the property policy under (a)(1) and (b) of this section must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for the loss are payable to an insurance trustee designated for the purpose or to the association and not to a holder of a security interest. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold insurance proceeds in trust for the association, unit owners, and lien holders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of (h) of this section, the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and the association, unit owners, and lien holders are not entitled to receive payment of a portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored or unless the common interest community is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for the benefit of the unit owner.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to a unit owner or holder of a security interest. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until 30 days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, each unit owner, and each holder of a security interest to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their last known addresses.

A portion of the common interest community for which insurance is required under this section that is damaged or destroyed must be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless: the common interest community is terminated and AS

34.08.260

applies; repairs or replacement would be illegal under a state statute or municipal ordinance governing health or safety; or 80 percent of the unit owners, including each owner of a unit or assigned limited common element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If the entire common interest community is not repaired or replaced, (1) the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the common interest community, and (2) except to the extent that other persons will be distributees, (A) the insurance proceeds attributable to a unit and limited common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owner of the unit and the owner of the unit to which the limited common elements were allocated, or to lien holders, as their interests may appear, and (B) the remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to each unit owner or lien holder, as their interests may appear, as follows: (i) in a condominium, in proportion to the common element interest of all the units and (ii) in a cooperative or planned community, in proportion to the common expense liabilities of all the units. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild a unit, the allocated interests of the unit are reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under AS

34.08.740(a)

, and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations, and file and record a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in a common interest community if all of the units are restricted to nonresidential use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 24 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.450.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses and prepayment of reserves must be paid to the unit owners in proportion to common expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce future common expense assessments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)